test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kar_gt-norm.yaml
Tests:
# The were proofread for golden standard by Larisa Ponomareva 2019-10-09
  
  Noun - кар: # Nouns in hard consonants: б, г, ж, к, м, п, р, ф, х, ц, ч, щ, ш - inanimate noun, full paradigm 'city / kaupunki / город'
     кар+N+Sg+Nom: кар
     кар+N+Sg+Acc: кар
     кар+N+Sg+Gen: карлӧн
     кар+N+Sg+Abl: карлісь
     кар+N+Sg+Dat: карлӧ
     кар+N+Sg+Ins: карӧн
     кар+N+Sg+Com: каркӧт
     кар+N+Sg+Car: картӧг
     кар+N+Sg+Cns: карла
     кар+N+Sg+Cmpr: карся
     кар+N+Sg+Ine: карын
     кар+N+Sg+Ela: карись
     кар+N+Sg+Ill: карӧ
     кар+N+Sg+Apr: карлань
     кар+N+Sg+Egr: карсянь
     кар+N+Sg+Prl: карӧт
     кар+N+Sg+TerI: карӧдз
     кар+N+Sg+TerII: карви
     кар+N+Sg+AprIne: карланьын
     кар+N+Sg+AprEla: карланись
     кар+N+Sg+AprIll: карланьӧ
     кар+N+Sg+AprEgr: карланьсянь
     кар+N+Sg+AprPrl: карланьӧт
     кар+N+Sg+AprTerI: карланьӧдз
     кар+N+Sg+AprTerII: карланьви
     кар+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: карӧ
     кар+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: карӧлӧн
     кар+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: карӧлісь
     кар+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: карӧлӧ
     кар+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: карӧс
     кар+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg1: карнам
     кар+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: карӧкӧт
     кар+N+Sg+Car+PxSg1: [карӧтӧг, картӧгьям]
     кар+N+Sg+Cns+PxSg1: карӧла
     кар+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1: карӧся
     кар+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: карам
     кар+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: карсим
     кар+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: карам
     кар+N+Sg+Apr+PxSg1: [карӧлань, карланям]
     кар+N+Sg+Egr+PxSg1: [карӧсянь, карсяням]
     кар+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg1: [карӧттям, карӧттим]
     кар+N+Sg+TerI+PxSg1: [карӧдззам, карӧдззим]
     кар+N+Sg+TerII+PxSg1: карӧви
     кар+N+Sg+AprIne+PxSg1: карланям
     кар+N+Sg+AprEla+PxSg1: карланьсим
     кар+N+Sg+AprIll+PxSg1: карланям
     кар+N+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg1: [карланьсяням, карӧланьсянь]
     кар+N+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg1: [карланьӧттям, карланьӧттим, карӧланьӧт]
     кар+N+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg1: [карланьӧдззам, карланьӧдззим, карӧланьӧдз]
     кар+N+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg1: карӧланьви
     кар+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: карыт
     кар+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: карытлӧн
     кар+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: карытлісь
     кар+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: карытлӧ
     кар+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: картӧ
     кар+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg2: карнат
     кар+N+Sg+Com+PxSg2: карыткӧт
     кар+N+Sg+Car+PxSg2: [карыттӧг, картӧгьят]
     кар+N+Sg+Cns+PxSg2: карытла
     кар+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg2: карытся
     кар+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: карат
     кар+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: карсит
     кар+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: карат
     кар+N+Sg+Apr+PxSg2: [карытлань, карланят]
     кар+N+Sg+Egr+PxSg2: [карытсянь, карсянят]
     кар+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg2: [карӧттят, карӧттит]
     кар+N+Sg+TerI+PxSg2: [карӧдззат, карӧдззит]
     кар+N+Sg+TerII+PxSg2: карытви
     кар+N+Sg+AprIne+PxSg2: карланят
     кар+N+Sg+AprEla+PxSg2: карланьсит
     кар+N+Sg+AprIll+PxSg2: карланят
     кар+N+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg2: [карланьсянят, карытланьсянь]
     кар+N+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg2: [карланьӧттят, карланьӧттит, карытланьӧт]
     кар+N+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg2: [карланьӧдззат, карланьӧдззит, карытланьӧдз]
     кар+N+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg2: карытланьви
     кар+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: карыс
     кар+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: карыслӧн
     кар+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: карыслісь
     кар+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: карыслӧ
     кар+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: карсӧ
     кар+N+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: карнас
     кар+N+Sg+Com+PxSg3: карыскӧт
     кар+N+Sg+Car+PxSg3: [карыстӧг, картӧгьяс]
     кар+N+Sg+Cns+PxSg3: карысла
     кар+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg3: карысся
     кар+N+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: карас
     кар+N+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: карсис
     кар+N+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: карас
     кар+N+Sg+Apr+PxSg3: [карыслань, карланяс]
     кар+N+Sg+Egr+PxSg3: [карыссянь, карсяняс]
     кар+N+Sg+Prl+PxSg3: [карӧттяс, карӧттис]
     кар+N+Sg+TerI+PxSg3: [карӧдззас, карӧдззис]
     кар+N+Sg+TerII+PxSg3: карысви
     кар+N+Sg+AprIne+PxSg3: карланяс
     кар+N+Sg+AprEla+PxSg3: карланьсис
     кар+N+Sg+AprIll+PxSg3: карланяс
     кар+N+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg3: [карланьсяняс, карысланьсянь]
     кар+N+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg3: [карланьӧттяc, карланьӧттиc, карысланьӧт]
     кар+N+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg3: [карланьӧдззаc, карланьӧдззиc, карысланьӧдз]
     кар+N+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg3: карысланьви
     кар+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: карным
     кар+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: карнымлӧн
     кар+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: карнымлісь
     кар+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: карнымлӧ
     кар+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: карнымӧс
     кар+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl1: карнаным
     кар+N+Sg+Com+PxPl1: карнымкӧт
     кар+N+Sg+Car+PxPl1: [карнымтӧг, картӧгьяным]
     кар+N+Sg+Cns+PxPl1: карнымла
     кар+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl1: карнымся
     кар+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: караным
     кар+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: карсиным
     кар+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: караным
     кар+N+Sg+Apr+PxPl1: [карнымлань, карланяным]
     кар+N+Sg+Egr+PxPl1: [карнымсянь, карсяняным]
     кар+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl1: [карӧттяным, карӧттиным]
     кар+N+Sg+TerI+PxPl1: [карӧдззаным, карӧдззиным]
     кар+N+Sg+TerII+PxPl1: карнымви
     кар+N+Sg+AprIne+PxPl1: карланяным
     кар+N+Sg+AprEla+PxPl1: карланьсиным
     кар+N+Sg+AprIll+PxPl1: карланяным
     кар+N+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl1: [карланьсяняным, карнымланьсянь]
     кар+N+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl1: [карланьӧттяным, карланьӧттиным, карнымланьӧт]
     кар+N+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl1: [карланьӧдззаным, карланьӧдззиным,  карнымланьӧдз]
     кар+N+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl1: карнымланьви
     кар+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: карныт
     кар+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: карнытлӧн
     кар+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: карнытлісь
     кар+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: карнытлӧ
     кар+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: карнытӧ
     кар+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl2: карнаныт
     кар+N+Sg+Com+PxPl2: карныткӧт
     кар+N+Sg+Car+PxPl2: [карныттӧг, картӧгьяныт]
     кар+N+Sg+Cns+PxPl2: карнытла
     кар+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl2: карнытся
     кар+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: караныт
     кар+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: карсиныт
     кар+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: караныт
     кар+N+Sg+Apr+PxPl2: [карнытлань, карланяныт]
     кар+N+Sg+Egr+PxPl2: [карнытсянь, карсяняныт]
     кар+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl2: [карӧттяныт, карӧттиныт]
     кар+N+Sg+TerI+PxPl2: [карӧдззаныт, карӧдззиныт]
     кар+N+Sg+TerII+PxPl2: карнытви
     кар+N+Sg+AprIne+PxPl2: карланяныт
     кар+N+Sg+AprEla+PxPl2: карланьсиныт
     кар+N+Sg+AprIll+PxPl2: карланяныт
     кар+N+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl2: [карланьсяняныт, карнытланьсянь]
     кар+N+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl2: [карланьӧттяныт, карланьӧттиныт, карнытланьӧт]
     кар+N+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl2: [карланьӧдззаныт, карланьӧдззиныт, карнытланьӧдз]
     кар+N+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl2: карнытланьви
     кар+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: карныс
     кар+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: карныслӧн
     кар+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: карныслісь
     кар+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: карныслӧ
     кар+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: карнысӧ
     кар+N+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: карнаныс
     кар+N+Sg+Com+PxPl3: карныскӧт
     кар+N+Sg+Car+PxPl3: [карныстӧг, картӧгьяныс]
     кар+N+Sg+Cns+PxPl3: карнысла
     кар+N+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl3: карнысся
     кар+N+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: караныс
     кар+N+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: карсиныс
     кар+N+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: караныс
     кар+N+Sg+Apr+PxPl3: [карныслань, карланяныс]
     кар+N+Sg+Egr+PxPl3: [карныссянь, карсяняныс]
     кар+N+Sg+Prl+PxPl3: [карӧттяныс, карӧттиныс]
     кар+N+Sg+TerI+PxPl3: [карӧдззаныс, карӧдззиныс]
     кар+N+Sg+TerII+PxPl3: карнысви
     кар+N+Sg+AprIne+PxPl3: карланяныс
     кар+N+Sg+AprEla+PxPl3: карланьсиныс
     кар+N+Sg+AprIll+PxPl3: карланяныс
     кар+N+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl3: [карланьсяняныс, карнысланьсянь]
     кар+N+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl3: [карланьӧттяныс, карланьӧттиныс, карнысланьӧт]
     кар+N+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl3: [карланьӧдззаныс, карланьӧдззиныс, карнысланьӧдз]
     кар+N+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl3: карнысланьви
     кар+N+Pl+Nom: каррез
     кар+N+Pl+Acc: каррез
     кар+N+Pl+Gen: каррезлӧн
     кар+N+Pl+Abl: каррезлісь
     кар+N+Pl+Dat: каррезлӧ
     кар+N+Pl+Ins: каррезӧн
     кар+N+Pl+Com: каррезкӧт
     кар+N+Pl+Car: каррезтӧг
     кар+N+Pl+Cns: каррезла
     кар+N+Pl+Cmpr: каррезся
     кар+N+Pl+Ine: каррезын
     кар+N+Pl+Ela: каррезісь
     кар+N+Pl+Ill: каррезӧ
     кар+N+Pl+Apr: каррезлань
     кар+N+Pl+Egr: каррезсянь
     кар+N+Pl+Prl: каррезӧт
     кар+N+Pl+TerI: каррезӧдз
     кар+N+Pl+TerII: каррезви
     кар+N+Pl+AprIne: каррезланьын
     кар+N+Pl+AprEla: каррезланись
     кар+N+Pl+AprIll: каррезланьӧ
     кар+N+Pl+AprEgr: каррезланьсянь
     кар+N+Pl+AprPrl: каррезланьӧт
     кар+N+Pl+AprTerI: каррезланьӧдз
     кар+N+Pl+AprTerII: каррезланьви
     кар+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: каррезӧ
     кар+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: каррезӧлӧн
     кар+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: каррезӧлісь
     кар+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: каррезӧлӧ
     кар+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: каррезӧс
     кар+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg1: каррезнам
     кар+N+Pl+Com+PxSg1: каррезӧкӧт
     кар+N+Pl+Car+PxSg1: [каррезӧтӧг, каррезтӧгьям]
     кар+N+Pl+Cns+PxSg1: каррезӧла
     кар+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg1: каррезӧся
     кар+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg1: каррезам
     кар+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg1: [каррезсим, карресим]
     кар+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg1: каррезам
     кар+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg1: [каррезӧлань, каррезланям]
     кар+N+Pl+Egr+PxSg1: [каррезӧсянь, каррезсяням]
     кар+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg1: [каррезӧттям, каррезӧттим]
     кар+N+Pl+TerI+PxSg1: [каррезӧдззам, каррезӧдззим]
     кар+N+Pl+TerII+PxSg1: каррезӧви
     кар+N+Pl+AprIne+PxSg1: каррезланям
     кар+N+Pl+AprEla+PxSg1: каррезланьсим
     кар+N+Pl+AprIll+PxSg1: каррезланям
     кар+N+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg1: [каррезланьсяням, каррезӧланьсянь]
     кар+N+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg1: [каррезланьӧттям, каррезланьӧттим, каррезӧланьӧт]
     кар+N+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg1: [каррезланьӧдззам, каррезланьӧдззим, каррезӧланьӧдз]
     кар+N+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg1: каррезӧланьви
     кар+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: [каррет, каррезыт]
     кар+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: [карретлӧн, каррезытлӧн]
     кар+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: [карретлісь, каррезытлісь]
     кар+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: [карретлӧ, каррезытлӧ]
     кар+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: [карретӧ, каррезтӧ]
     кар+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg2: каррезнат
     кар+N+Pl+Com+PxSg2: [карреткӧт, каррезыткӧт]
     кар+N+Pl+Car+PxSg2: [карреттӧг, каррезыттӧг, каррезтӧгьят]
     кар+N+Pl+Cns+PxSg2: [карретла, каррезытла]
     кар+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg2: [каррется, каррезытся]
     кар+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg2: каррезат
     кар+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg2: [каррезсит, карресит]
     кар+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: каррезат
     кар+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg2: [карретлань, каррезытлань, каррезланят]
     кар+N+Pl+Egr+PxSg2: [карретсянь, каррезытсянь, каррезсянят]
     кар+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg2: [каррезӧттят, каррезӧттит]
     кар+N+Pl+TerI+PxSg2: [каррезӧдззат, каррезӧдззит]
     кар+N+Pl+TerII+PxSg2: [карретви, каррезытви]
     кар+N+Pl+AprIne+PxSg2: каррезланят
     кар+N+Pl+AprEla+PxSg2: каррезланьсит
     кар+N+Pl+AprIll+PxSg2: каррезланят
     кар+N+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg2: [каррезланьсянят, карретланьсянь, каррезытланьсянь]
     кар+N+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg2: [каррезланьӧттят, каррезланьӧттит, карретланьӧт, каррезытланьӧт]
     кар+N+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg2: [каррезланьӧдззат, каррезланьӧдззит, карретланьӧдз, каррезытланьӧдз]
     кар+N+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg2: [карретланьви, каррезытланьви]
     кар+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: [каррес, каррезыс]
     кар+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: [карреслӧн, каррезыслӧн]
     кар+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [карреслісь, каррезыслісь]
     кар+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: [карреслӧ, каррезыслӧ]
     кар+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: [карресӧ, каррезсӧ]
     кар+N+Pl+Ins+PxSg3: каррезнас
     кар+N+Pl+Com+PxSg3: [каррескӧт, каррезыскӧт]
     кар+N+Pl+Car+PxSg3: [каррестӧг, каррезыстӧг, каррезтӧгьяс]
     кар+N+Pl+Cns+PxSg3: [карресла, каррезысла]
     кар+N+Pl+Cmpr+PxSg3: [карресся, каррезысся]
     кар+N+Pl+Ine+PxSg3: каррезас
     кар+N+Pl+Ela+PxSg3: [каррезсис, карресис]
     кар+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg3: каррезас
     кар+N+Pl+Apr+PxSg3: [карреслань, каррезыслань, каррезланяс]
     кар+N+Pl+Egr+PxSg3: [каррессянь, каррезыссянь, каррезсяняс]
     кар+N+Pl+Prl+PxSg3: [каррезӧттяс, каррезӧттис]
     кар+N+Pl+TerI+PxSg3: [каррезӧдззас, каррезӧдззис]
     кар+N+Pl+TerII+PxSg3: карресви
     кар+N+Pl+AprIne+PxSg3: каррезланяс
     кар+N+Pl+AprEla+PxSg3: каррезланьсис
     кар+N+Pl+AprIll+PxSg3: каррезланяс
     кар+N+Pl+AprEgr+PxSg3: [каррезланьсяняс, карресланьсянь, каррезысланьсянь]
     кар+N+Pl+AprPrl+PxSg3: [каррезланьӧттяс, каррезланьӧттис, карресланьӧт, каррезысланьӧт]
     кар+N+Pl+AprTerI+PxSg3: [каррезланьӧдззаc, каррезланьӧдззиc, карресланьӧдз, каррезысланьӧдз]
     кар+N+Pl+AprTerII+PxSg3: карресланьви
     кар+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: каррезным
     кар+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: каррезнымлӧн
     кар+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: каррезнымлісь
     кар+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: каррезнымлӧ
     кар+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: каррезнымӧс
     кар+N+Pl+Ins+PxPl1: каррезнаным
     кар+N+Pl+Com+PxPl1: каррезнымкӧт
